New Jersey, session 222, S52.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1991, c.397 (C.2C:58-15) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  A person who knows or reasonably should know that a minor is likely to gain access to a loaded firearm at a premises under the persons control commits a disorderly persons offense if a minor gains access to the firearm, unless the person: (1)   Stores the firearm in a securely locked box or container; (2)   Stores the firearm in a location which a reasonable person would believe to be secure; or (3)   Secures the firearm with a trigger lock. b.    This section shall not apply: (1)   To activities authorized by section 14 of P.L.1979, c.179, (C.2C:58-6.1), concerning the lawful use of a firearm by a minor; [or] (2)   Under circumstances where a minor obtained a firearm as a result of an unlawful entry by any person; or (3)   Under circumstances where a minor obtained a firearm for the purpose of self-protection pursuant to the provisions of N.J.S.2C:3-4. c.     As used in this act, "minor" means a person under the age of 16. d.    A person who violates this section is guilty of a crime of the fourth degree if a minors access to a loaded firearm causes the bodily injury of any person.  A person who violates this section is guilty of a crime of the third degree if a minors access to a loaded firearm causes the death or serious bodily injury of any person.  For the purposes of this section, bodily injury or serious bodily injury shall have the same meaning set forth in N.J.S.2C:11-1. (cf: P.L.1991, c.397, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.